es: Tren de aterrizaje de avión a control remoto: Fijo; Sin tren de aterrizaje; Retráctil; Patines/aterrizaje sobre la panza; Flotadores de agua; Otro
sv: Radiostyrt flygplan – typ av landningsställ: Fast; Utan landningsställ; Infällbart; Medar/buklandning; Flottörer; Annat
pt-PT: Tipo de trem de aterragem do avião de controlo remoto: Fixo; Sem trem de aterragem; Retrátil; Patins/aterragem de barriga; Flutuadores para água; Outro
th: แบบล้อลงจอดของเครื่องบินบังคับวิทยุ: แบบคงที่; ไม่มีฐานล้อ; แบบพับเก็บได้; ขาหยั่ง/ลงจอดด้วยท้องเครื่องบิน; ทุ่นลอยน้ำ; อื่นๆ
en: Remote control plane landing gear type: Fixed; No landing gear; Retractable; Skids/belly landing; Water floats; Other
vi: Loại càng đáp máy bay điều khiển từ xa: Cố định; Không có thiết bị hạ cánh; Có thể thu vào; Càng trượt/hạ cánh bằng bụng; Phao nổi trên nước; Khác
el: Τύπος συστήματος προσγείωσης τηλεκατευθυνόμενου αεροπλάνου: Σταθερό; Χωρίς σύστημα προσγείωσης; Ανασυρόμενο; Πέδιλα/προσγείωση με την κοιλιά; Πλωτήρες νερού; Άλλο
zh-TW: 遙控飛機起落架類型: 固定式; 無起落架; 收放式; 滑橇/機腹著陸; 水上浮筒; 其他
cs: Typ podvozku letadla s dálkovým ovládáním: Pevný; Bez podvozku; Zatahovací; Ližiny / přistání na břicho; Plováky na vodu; Jiné
ro-RO: Tipul trenului de aterizare al avionului cu telecomandă: Fix; Fără tren de aterizare; Retractabil; Pantine/aterizare pe burtă; Flotoare pentru apă; Altele
lt-LT: Nuotoliniu būdu valdomo lėktuvo važiuoklės tipas: Fiksuota; Be važiuoklės; Įtraukiama; Pačiūžos / nusileidimas ant pilvo; Vandens plūdurai; Kitas
da: Fjernbetjent flys landingsstelstype: Fast; Intet landingsstel; Indtrækkeligt; Meder/mavelanding; Pontoner; Andet
nl: RC-vliegtuig landingsgestel type: Vast; Geen landingsgestel; Intrekbaar; Glijders/buiklanding; Drijvers; Overig
fr: Type de train d’atterrissage de l’avion radiocommandé: Fixe; Aucun train d’atterrissage; Rétractable; Patins/atterrissage sur le ventre; Flotteurs; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta podvozja daljinsko vodenega letala: Fiksno; Brez podvozja; Zložljivo; Sani / pristanek na trebuh; Plovci za vodo; Drugo
nb: Type landingsutstyr for fjernstyr fly: Fast; Uten landingsutstyr; Innfellbart; Meier/buklanding; Flottører; Annet
ja: 遠隔操作飛行機の着陸装置の種類: 固定式; ランディングギアなし; 引き込み式; スキッド/胴体着陸; フロート式; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta stajnog trapa za avion s daljinskim upravljanjem: Fiksno; Bez stajnog trapa; Uvlačivo; Saonice / slijetanje na trbuh; Vodeni plovci; Ostalo
it: Tipo di carrello di atterraggio per aereo telecomandato: Fisso; Senza carrello d'atterraggio; Retrattile; Pattini/atterraggio di pancia; Galleggianti; Altro
pt-BR: Controle remoto avião trem de pouso tipo: Fixo; Sem trem de pouso; Retrátil; Patins/pouso de barriga; Flutuadores para água; Outro
fi: Kauko-ohjattavan lentokoneen laskutelineiden tyyppi: Kiinteä; Ei laskutelinettä; Sisäänvedettävä; Jalakset / mahalasku; Vesikellukkeet; Muu
ru: Тип шасси радиоуправляемого самолета: Фиксированное; Без шасси; Убирающееся; Полозья / посадка на фюзеляж; Поплавки для воды; Другое
pl: Typ podwozia samolotu zdalnie sterowanego: Stałe; Brak podwozia; Chowane; Płozy/lądowanie na brzuchu; Pływaki; Inne
ko: 원격 조종 비행기 착륙 장치 유형: 고정형; 랜딩 기어 없음; 접이식; 스키드/동체 착륙; 수상 플로트; 기타
sk-SK: Typ podvozku lietadla na diaľkové ovládanie: Pevný; Bez podvozka; Zaťahovací; Lyžiny / pristátie na bruchu; Vodné plaváky; Iné
de: Fahrwerkstyp für RC-Flugzeuge: Starr; Kein Fahrwerk; Einziehbar; Kufen/Bauchlandung; Schwimmer; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 遥控飞机起落架类型: 固定; 无起落架; 可伸缩; 滑橇/机腹着陆; 浮筒; 其他
bg-BG: Тип колесник на радиоуправляем самолет: Фиксиран; Без колесник; Прибиращ се; Плъзгачи/кацане по корем; Водни поплавъци; Други
hu: Távirányítós repülőgép futóműtípusa: Fix; Futómű nélkül; Behúzható; Talpak/hasraszállás; Vízi úszótestek; Egyéb
tr: Uzaktan kumandalı uçak iniş takımı tipi: Sabit; İniş takımı yok; Geri çekilebilir; Kızak / gövde üstü iniş; Su dubaları; Diğer